Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 4. Emergency Custody and Involuntary Temporary Detention.
§ 37.2-809.
Involuntary temporary detention; issuance and execution of order.

For the purposes of this section:

“Designee of the local community services board”
means an examiner designated by the local community services board who (i) is skilled in the assessment and treatment of mental illness, (ii) has completed a certification program approved by the Department, (iii) is able to provide an independent examination of the person, (iv) is not related by blood or marriage to the person being evaluated, (v) has no financial interest in the admission or treatment of the person being evaluated, (vi) has no investment interest in the facility detaining or admitting the person under this article, and (vii) except for employees of state hospitals and of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, is not employed by the facility.

“Employee”
means an employee of the local community services board who is skilled in the assessment and treatment of mental illness and has completed a certification program approved by the Department.

“Investment interest”
means the ownership or holding of an equity or debt security, including shares of stock in a corporation, interests or units of a partnership, bonds, debentures, notes, or other equity or debt instruments.

A magistrate shall issue, upon the sworn petition of any responsible person, treating physician, or upon his own motion and only after an evaluation conducted in-person or by means of a two-way electronic video and audio communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

by an employee or a designee of the local community services board to determine whether the person meets the criteria for temporary detention, a temporary detention order if it appears from all evidence readily available, including any recommendation from a physician, clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor treating the person, that the person (i) has a mental illness and that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (a) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (b) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs; (ii) is in need of hospitalization or treatment; and (iii) is unwilling to volunteer or incapable of volunteering for hospitalization or treatment. The magistrate shall also consider, if available, (a) information provided by the person who initiated emergency custody and (b) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician licensed in Virginia either verbally or in writing prior to rendering a decision. Any temporary detention order entered pursuant to this section shall provide for the disclosure of medical records pursuant to §

37.2-804.2

. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law.

When considering whether there is probable cause to issue a temporary detention order, the magistrate may, in addition to the petition, consider (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician, psychologist, clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the person, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the person, (iv) any relevant hearsay evidence, (v) any medical records available, (vi) any affidavits submitted, if the witness is unavailable and it so states in the affidavit, and (vii) any other information available that the magistrate considers relevant to the determination of whether probable cause exists to issue a temporary detention order.

A magistrate may issue a temporary detention order without an emergency custody order proceeding. A magistrate may issue a temporary detention order without a prior evaluation pursuant to subsection B if (i) the person has been personally examined within the previous 72 hours by an employee or a designee of the local community services board or (ii) there is a significant physical, psychological, or medical risk to the person or to others associated with conducting such evaluation.

An employee or a designee of the local community services board shall determine the facility of temporary detention in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-809.1

for all persons detained pursuant to this section. An employee or designee of the local community services board may change the facility of temporary detention and may designate an alternative facility for temporary detention at any point during the period of temporary detention if it is determined that the alternative facility is a more appropriate facility for temporary detention of the person given the specific security, medical, or behavioral health needs of the person. In cases in which the facility of temporary detention is changed following transfer of custody to an initial facility of temporary custody, transportation of the person to the alternative facility of temporary detention shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-810

. The initial facility of temporary detention shall be identified on the preadmission screening report and indicated on the temporary detention order; however, if an employee or designee of the local community services board designates an alternative facility, that employee or designee shall provide written notice forthwith, on a form developed by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, to the clerk of the issuing court of the name and address of the alternative facility. Subject to the provisions of §

37.2-809.1

, if a facility of temporary detention cannot be identified by the time of the expiration of the period of emergency custody pursuant to §

37.2-808

, the person shall be detained in a state facility for the treatment of persons with mental illness and such facility shall be indicated on the temporary detention order. Except as provided in §

37.2-811

for inmates requiring hospitalization in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

19.2-169.6

, the person shall not be detained in a jail or other place of confinement for persons charged with criminal offenses. Except as provided in §

37.2-811

for inmates requiring hospitalization in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

19.2-169.6

, the person shall remain in the custody of law enforcement until (i) the person is either detained within a secure facility or (ii) custody has been accepted by the appropriate personnel designated by either the initial facility of temporary detention identified in the temporary detention order or by the alternative facility of temporary detention designated by the employee or designee of the local community services board pursuant to this subsection. The person detained or in custody pursuant to this section shall be given a written summary of the temporary detention procedures and the statutory protections associated with those procedures.

Any facility caring for a person placed with it pursuant to a temporary detention order is authorized to provide emergency medical and psychiatric services within its capabilities when the facility determines that the services are in the best interests of the person within its care. The costs incurred as a result of the hearings and by the facility in providing services during the period of temporary detention shall be paid and recovered pursuant to §

37.2-804

. The maximum costs reimbursable by the Commonwealth pursuant to this section shall be established by the State Board of Medical Assistance Services based on reasonable criteria. The State Board of Medical Assistance Services shall, by regulation, establish a reasonable rate per day of inpatient care for temporary detention.

The employee or the designee of the local community services board who is conducting the evaluation pursuant to this section shall determine, prior to the issuance of the temporary detention order, the insurance status of the person. Where coverage by a third party payor exists, the facility seeking reimbursement under this section shall first seek reimbursement from the third party payor. The Commonwealth shall reimburse the facility only for the balance of costs remaining after the allowances covered by the third party payor have been received.

The duration of temporary detention shall be sufficient to allow for completion of the examination required by §

37.2-815

, preparation of the preadmission screening report required by §

37.2-816

, and initiation of mental health treatment to stabilize the person’s psychiatric condition to avoid involuntary commitment where possible, but shall not exceed 72 hours prior to a hearing. If the 72-hour period herein specified terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the person may be detained, as herein provided, until the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. The person may be released, pursuant to §

37.2-813

, before the 72-hour period herein specified has run.

If a temporary detention order is not executed within 24 hours of its issuance, or within a shorter period as is specified in the order, the order shall be void and shall be returned unexecuted to the office of the clerk of the issuing court or, if the office is not open, to any magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court. Subsequent orders may be issued upon the original petition within 96 hours after the petition is filed. However, a magistrate must again obtain the advice of an employee or a designee of the local community services board prior to issuing a subsequent order upon the original petition. Any petition for which no temporary detention order or other process in connection therewith is served on the subject of the petition within 96 hours after the petition is filed shall be void and shall be returned to the office of the clerk of the issuing court.

The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall establish and require that a magistrate, as provided by this section, be available seven days a week, 24 hours a day, for the purpose of performing the duties established by this section. Each community services board shall provide to each general district court and magistrate’s office within its service area a list of its employees and designees who are available to perform the evaluations required herein.

For purposes of this section, a health care provider or designee of a local community services board or behavioral health authority shall not be required to encrypt any email containing information or medical records provided to a magistrate unless there is reason to believe that a third party will attempt to intercept the email.

If the employee or designee of the community services board who is conducting the evaluation pursuant to this section recommends that the person should not be subject to a temporary detention order, such employee or designee shall (i) inform the petitioner, the person who initiated emergency custody if such person is present, and an onsite treating physician of his recommendation; (ii) promptly inform such person who initiated emergency custody that the community services board will facilitate communication between the person and the magistrate if the person disagrees with recommendations of the employee or designee of the community services board who conducted the evaluation and the person who initiated emergency custody so requests; and (iii) upon prompt request made by the person who initiated emergency custody, arrange for such person who initiated emergency custody to communicate with the magistrate as soon as is practicable and prior to the expiration of the period of emergency custody. The magistrate shall consider any information provided by the person who initiated emergency custody and any recommendations of the treating or examining physician and the employee or designee of the community services board who conducted the evaluation and consider such information and recommendations in accordance with subsection B in making his determination to issue a temporary detention order. The person who is the subject of emergency custody shall remain in the custody of law enforcement or a designee of law enforcement and shall not be released from emergency custody until communication with the magistrate pursuant to this subsection has concluded and the magistrate has made a determination regarding issuance of a temporary detention order.

For purposes of this section, “person who initiated emergency custody” means any person who initiated the issuance of an emergency custody order pursuant to §

37.2-808

or a law-enforcement officer who takes a person into custody pursuant to subsection G of §

37.2-808

.

In any case in which a person subject to an evaluation pursuant to this section is receiving services in a hospital emergency department, the treating physician or his designee and the employee or designee of the local community services board shall disclose to each other relevant information pertaining to the individual's treatment in the emergency department.

History.

1974, c. 351, § 37.1-67.1; 1975, cc. 237, 433; 1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.4; 1980, c. 582; 1981, cc. 233, 463; 1982, c. 435; 1986, cc. 134, 478, 629; 1987, c. 96; 1988, c. 98; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 429, 728; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 566; 1995, c. 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1998, cc. 37, 594, 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 526; 2008, cc. 331, 551, 691, 728, 779, 782, 793, 828, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 340, 406, 778, 825; 2013, cc. 87, 321; 2014, cc. 499, 538, 675, 691, 761, 773; 2016, cc. 569, 693; 2020, c. 945; 2022, cc. 473, 474, 482, 509.

Cross references.

As to this section’s applicability to minors, see § 16.1-340.

As to review of continuation of confinement hearings, procedures and reports for persons found not guilty by reason of insanity, see §

19.2-182.5

.

As to transportation of person subject to involuntary temporary custody, see §

37.2-829

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4, and c. 773, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 5, and 761, cl. 2 provides: “That the Governor’s Task Force on Improving Mental Health Services and Crisis Response created on December 10, 2013, by Executive Order 68 shall identify and examine issues related to the use of law enforcement in the involuntary admission process. The task force shall consider options to reduce the amount of resources needed to detain individuals during the emergency custody order period, including the amount of time spent providing transportation throughout the admission process. Such options shall include developing crisis stabilization units in all regions of the Commonwealth and contracting for retired officers to provide needed transportation. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by October 1, 2014.”

Acts 2015, c. 742, cl. 1 provides: “The Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Commissioner) shall, in conjunction with relevant stakeholders including the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards, the National Alliance on Mental Illness — Virginia, the Psychiatric Society of Virginia, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Academy of Clinical Psychologists, the Medical Society of Virginia, and the University of Virginia Institute for Law, Psychiatry, and Public Policy, review the current practice of conducting emergency evaluations for individuals subject to involuntary civil admission. Such review shall identify community services boards and catchment areas where significant delays in responding to emergency evaluations are occurring or have occurred in recent years. Further, the Commissioner shall develop a comprehensive plan to authorize psychiatrists and emergency physicians to evaluate individuals for involuntary civil admission where appropriate to expedite emergency evaluations. The review and comprehensive plan including recommendations shall be completed by November 15, 2015, and reported to the Governor and the Joint Subcommittee Studying Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the 21st Century, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health.”

Acts 2020, cc. 918 and 919, cl. 1 provides: “That the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall establish a work group to (i) review the current process for conducting evaluations of persons who are subject to emergency custody orders to determine whether they meet the criteria for temporary detention, including any challenges or barriers to timely completion of such evaluations and factors giving rise to delays in completion of such evaluations, and (ii) develop a comprehensive plan to expand the individuals who may conduct effective evaluations of persons who are subject to emergency custody orders to determine whether they meet the criteria for temporary detention. The work group shall consider other states’ experiences in expanding the individuals who may conduct evaluations of persons subject to emergency custody orders. Such comprehensive plan shall include specific recommendations for legislative or budget actions necessary to implement the plan. The work group shall include representatives of the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards, the National Alliance on Mental Illness — Virginia, the Virginia Organization of Consumers Asserting Leadership (VOCAL), the Psychiatric Society of Virginia, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Medical Society of Virginia, and such other stakeholders as the Commissioner may deem appropriate. The work group shall report its findings and conclusions and the comprehensive plan to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, and the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the 21st Century by December 1, 2020.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 526 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 331, in subsection B, substituted “magistrate shall issue” for “magistrate may issue” and inserted “treating physician” following “any responsible person” near the beginning of the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical, and substituted “magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court” for “magistrate thereof” at the end of the first sentence in subsection H [now I].

The 2008 amendment by c. 728 inserted “and shall remain in the custody of law enforcement until the person is either detained within a secure facility or custody has been accepted by the appropriate personnel designated by the facility identified in the temporary detention order” at the end of subsection D [now subsection E].

The 2008 amendment by c. 779, in subsection B, substituted clause (i) for former clauses (i) and (ii), which read: “(i) has mental illness, (ii) presents an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or is so seriously mentally ill as to be substantially unable to care for himself”; redesignated former clauses (iii) and (iv) accordingly.

The 2008 amendment by c. 782 added the last two sentences in subsection B.

The 2008 amendment by c. 793 inserted subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2008 amendment by c. 828 added subsection J, which was subsequently redesignated as subsection K by the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and deleted “or behavioral health authority” in the first and second paragraphs of subsection A and in subsection J; rewrote subsection B; added subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “evaluation pursuant to subsection B” for “in person evaluation” in D; in subsection H, inserted “be sufficient to allow for completion of the examination required by §

37.2-815

, preparation of the preadmission screening report required by §

37.2-816

, and initiation of mental health treatment to stabilize the person’s psychiatric condition to avoid involuntary commitment where possible, but shall” and “close of business on the” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and added subsection K, which was subsequently redesignated as subsection L by the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted “except that a temporary detention order for a minor pursuant to § 16.1-340 shall only be issued if the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment set forth in § 16.1-345” at the end of clause (iii) in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 340 and 406 are identical, and substituted “inmates” for “defendants” in the fourth sentence of subsection E.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and deleted “except that a temporary detention order for a minor pursuant to § 16.1-340 shall only be issued if the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment set forth in § 16.1-345” following “hospitalization or treatment” in subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 87 and 321 are identical, and substituted “The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia” for “The chief judge of each general district court” at the beginning of subsection J, and made minor stylistic changes in subsections K and L.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 499 and 538 are identical and, in subsection H, substituted “72” for “48” throughout the subsection, inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” twice, and made related changes.

The 2014 amendment by c. 675, in subsection E, added the second and third sentence, in the fourth sentence substituted “initial facility of temporary detention”
for “facility” and added the language beginning “however,” and in the sentence beginning “Except as provided” substituted “either the initial facility of temporary detention identified in the temporary detention order or by the alternative facility of temporary detention designated by the employee or designee of the local community services board pursuant to this subsection” for “the initial facility identified in the temporary detention order.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 691 in subsection E inserted “in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-809.1

,” deleted the second sentence, which read “The facility of temporary detention shall be one that has been approved pursuant to the regulations of the Board”; and added the third and last sentences; and in subsection H substituted “72” for “48” throughout the subsection, inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” twice, and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment by c. 761, in subsection E added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment by c. 773, in subsection E, inserted “in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-809.1

” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read “The facility of temporary detention shall be one that has been approved pursuant to regulations of the Board.” and added the sentence which begins “Subject to the provisions of §

37.2-809.1

.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 569 and 693 are almost identical, and in subsection B, inserted “if available, (a) information provided by the person who initiated emergency custody and (b)” and deleted “if available” following “licensed in Virginia”; rewrote subsection L, which read “The employee or designee of the community services board who is conducting the evaluation pursuant to this section shall, if he recommends that the person should not be subject to a temporary detention order, inform the petitioner and an onsite treating physician of his recommendation”; and added subsection M.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 945, in subsection B, inserted “or clinical social worker” following “clinical psychologist” in the introductory wording in the first sentence; in subsection C, inserted “or clinical social worker” following “psychologist” in clause (i) and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 473 and 474 are identical, and added subsection N.

The 2022 amendment by c. 482 in subsection E, substituted the first and second occurrences of “persons” for “individuals” and the first, third, and fourth occurrences of “person” for “individual,” substituted “charged with criminal offenses. Except as provided in §

37.2-811

for inmates requiring hospitalization in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

19.2-169.6

, the person shall remain in the custody of law enforcement” for “charged with criminal offenses and shall remain in the custody of law enforcement,” and inserted clause (i) and (ii) designations; and substituted the last occurrence of “person” for “individual” in subsection L.

The 2022 amendment by c. 509, substituted “clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor” for “clinical psychologist, or clinical social worker” in subsection B; and substituted “psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor” for “psychologist, or clinical social worker” in clause (i) of subsection C.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-744 Civil Mental Emergency Custody Order, et seq.; No. 9-2017 Temporary Detention Order (Juvenile) — Magistrate.

§ 37.2-809.1.
Facility of temporary detention.

In each case in which an employee or designee of the local community services board as defined in §

37.2-809

is required to make an evaluation of an individual pursuant to subsection B, G, or H of §

37.2-808

, an employee or designee of the local community services board shall, upon being notified of the need for such evaluation, contact the state facility for the area in which the community services board is located and notify the state facility that the individual will be transported to the facility upon issuance of a temporary detention order if no other facility of temporary detention can be identified by the time of the expiration of the period of emergency custody pursuant to §

37.2-808

. Upon completion of the evaluation, the employee or designee of the local community services board shall convey to the state facility information about the individual necessary to allow the state facility to determine the services the individual will require upon admission.

A state facility may, following the notice in accordance with subsection A, conduct a search for an alternative facility that is able and willing to provide temporary detention and appropriate care to the individual, which may include another state facility if the state facility notified in accordance with subsection A is unable to provide temporary detention and appropriate care for the individual. Under no circumstances shall a state facility fail or refuse to admit an individual who meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

unless an alternative facility that is able to provide temporary detention and appropriate care agrees to accept the individual for temporary detention and the individual shall not during the duration of the temporary detention order be released from custody except for purposes of transporting the individual to the state facility or alternative facility in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-810

. If an alternative facility is identified and agrees to accept the individual for temporary detention, the state facility shall notify the community services board, and an employee or designee of the community services board shall designate the alternative facility on the prescreening report.

A state facility may conduct a search for an alternative facility that is able and willing to provide temporary detention and appropriate care to the individual in accordance with subsection B if the individual is in the custody of an alternative transportation provider.

The facility of temporary detention designated in accordance with this section shall be one that has been approved pursuant to regulations of the Board.

History.

2014, cc. 691, 773; 2015, cc. 121, 309; 2022, c. 482.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4, and c. 773, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 121 and 309 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “released from custody” for “released from the custody of the community services board” in the second sentence

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 482 added subsection C and redesignated accordingly.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Transportation pursuant to temporary detention order. —

Sheriff is not authorized under subsection O of §

37.2-808

to delay transportation of an individual following the issuance of a temporary detention order when the community services board and the designated state facility continue to search for an alternative facility. Rather, the sheriff should commence transportation to the designated state facility without delay, but if an alternative facility is identified during the period of transport, transportation should be provided to that facility instead. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Steve A. Hutcherson, Sheriff, Campbell County, 19-004,
(10/25/19).